Tennessee, session 114, HB0816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-504(a)(1), is amended by
inserting the following sentence immediately after the language "Class B misdemeanor.":
A traffic citation that is based solely upon a violation of this subdivision (a)(1) is
considered a nonmoving traffic violation.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-504(a)(2), is amended by
inserting the following sentence immediately after the language "Class A misdemeanor.":
A traffic citation that is based solely upon a violation of this subdivision (a)(2) is
considered a nonmoving traffic violation.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0816
003045
- 1 -